District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.29f

Charges for private vehicle-for-hire service.

A private vehicle-for-hire company may offer service at no charge, suggest a donation, or charge a fare; provided, that if a fare is charged the company shall comply with the fare transparency provisions pursuant to §  50-301.31(b)(2).

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 20j-6
as added Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(k), 61 DCR 12430

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.